Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.287

Commission's plans, programs, and projects—Director's approval required.

(1) Each commodity commission shall develop and submit to the director for approval any plans, programs, and projects concerning the following:

(a) The establishment, issuance, effectuation, and administration of appropriate programs or projects for the advertising and promotion of the affected commodity; and

(b) The establishment and effectuation of market research projects, market development projects, or both to the end that the marketing and utilization of the affected commodity may be encouraged, expanded, improved, or made more efficient.

(2) The director shall review each commodity commission's advertising or promotion program to ensure that no false claims are being made concerning the affected commodity.

(3) Each commodity commission, prior to the beginning of its fiscal year, shall prepare and submit to the director for approval its research plan, its commodity-related education and training plan, and its budget on a fiscal period basis.

(4) The director shall strive to review and make a determination of all submissions described in this section in a timely manner.

[ 2003 c 396 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.